Georgia, session 2025_26, SB318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 8 of Title 13 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to illegal and void
contracts generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"13-8-5.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Agreement' means any contract, combination, or other agreement, whether verbal or
written.
(2) 'Coordinating function' means:
S. B. 318
- 1 -

LC 60 0119
(A) Collecting historical or contemporaneous rental prices, supply levels, or rental
agreement termination and renewal dates of residential properties from two or more
landlords;
(B) Analyzing or processing the information described in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph through the use of a system, software, or process, including, but not limited
to, a computational process that uses machine learning or other artificial intelligence
techniques; and
(C) Recommending rental prices, rental agreement renewal terms, or ideal occupancy
levels to a landlord.
(3) 'Coordinator' means an individual who uses or causes to be used a system, software,
or process that performs a coordinating function for one or more landlords, including a
landlord that is performing a coordinating function for the landlord's own benefit.
(4) 'Landlord' means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of a residential property or any
person designated as an agent or representative of the owner, lessor, or sublessor,
including, but not limited to, an agent, a resident manager, or a designated property
manager.
(5) 'Parallel pricing coordination' means any agreement between two or more landlords
to raise, lower, change, maintain, or otherwise manipulate the rental price of two or more
residential properties.
(6) 'Person' means any individual, partnership, association, firm, public or private
corporation, trust, or unincorporated organization. Such term shall include a coordinator
or a landlord.
(7) 'Rental agreement' means any lease, rental, or other written agreement entered into
by a landlord and a tenant in order for such tenant to lease, sublease, let, or accept a grant
for consideration the right to possess and enjoy the use of a residential property.
S. B. 318
- 2 -

LC 60 0119
(8) 'Rental price' means any consideration a tenant must pay in order to lease, sublease,
let, or accept a grant of the right to possess and enjoy the use of a residential property
either for a fixed time or at the will of the landlord.
(9) 'Residential property' means any building, structure, or portion thereof which is used
or occupied as, or designed or intended for use or occupancy as, a residence.
(b) No person shall enter into, cause to be entered into, or perform a coordinating function
in relation to an agreement involving parallel pricing coordination. Any such agreement
shall be deemed an unenforceable contract in general restraint of trade as provided in Code
Section 13-8-2, and any person that enters into, causes to be entered into, or performs a
coordinating function in relation to the same shall be subject to a civil penalty of $1,000.00
per violation. The civil penalty provided for in this subsection shall be recoverable in a
civil action brought in any court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General or any
district attorney.
(c) The Department of Community Affairs shall develop and publish educational materials
informing residents of this state of the provisions of this Code section.
(d) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to apply to, impair, or otherwise
prohibit actions taken by a person or any federal, state, or local governmental entity, or any
official, employee, or agent thereof, while in the exercise or performance of any power or
duty imposed by a federal or state affordable or low-income housing law, program, or
initiative."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval and shall apply to all agreements related to residential property
entered into on or after such date and to all renewals, modifications, or extensions of such
agreements entered into on or after such date.
S. B. 318
- 3 -

LC 60 0119
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 318
- 4 -